Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4811.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin EXEMPTION FROM ASSISTED LIVING FACILITY DESIGN REQUIREMENTS; CITY OF BELVIEW.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Direction to commissioner of health. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health must approve a provisional license application submitted by an actively licensed nursing home applying for licensure as an assisted living facility if the nursing home is owned by a municipality and located in the city of Belview. Applications must be submitted on or before December 31, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Exemption from design requirements. new text end new text begin An actively licensed nursing home as described in subdivision 1 is exempt from design requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 144G.45, subdivision 4. This exemption does not apply to new construction, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 144G.08, subdivision 42. new text end